Montana, session 2025, HB224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Unlawful actions related to contributions or endorsements from
political party -- judge or judicial candidates. A judge or a judicial candidate may not knowingly seek,
accept, use, advertise, promote, or otherwise knowingly seek to benefit from a contribution or an endorsement
from a political party.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 13, chapter 35, part 2, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 35, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 224